Washington statutes.
RCW 35.54.010

Establishment.

(1) There is established in every city and town a fund to be designated the "local improvement guaranty fund" for the purpose of guaranteeing, to the extent of the fund, the payment of its local improvement bonds and warrants or other short-term obligations issued to pay for any local improvement ordered in the city or town or in any area wholly or partly outside its corporate boundaries: (a) In any city of the first class having a population of more than three hundred thousand, subsequent to June 8, 1927; (b) in any city or town having created and maintained a guaranty fund under chapter 141, Laws of 1923, subsequent to the date of establishment of such fund; and (c) in any other city or town subsequent to April 7, 1926: PROVIDED, That this shall not apply to any city of the first class which maintains a local improvement guaranty fund under chapter 138, Laws of 1917, but any such city maintaining a guaranty fund under chapter 138, Laws of 1917 may by ordinance elect to operate under the provisions of this chapter and may transfer to the guaranty fund created hereunder all the assets of the former fund and, upon such election and transfer, all bonds guaranteed under the former fund shall be guaranteed under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The local improvement guaranty fund established under subsection (1) of this section shall not be subject to any claim by the owner or holder of any local improvement bond, warrant, or other short-term obligation issued under an ordinance that provides that such obligations shall not be secured by the local improvement guaranty fund.

[ 2002 c 41 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 116 s 7; 1965 c 7 s 35.54.010. Prior: (i) 1917 c 138 s 1; RRS s 8986. (ii) 1917 c 138 s 2; RRS s 8987. (iii) 1917 c 138 s 3; RRS s 8988. (iv) 1917 c 138 s 4; RRS s 8989. (v) 1917 c 138 s 5; RRS s 8990. (vi) 1917 c 138 s 6; RRS s 8991. (vii) 1927 c 209 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 183 s 1; 1923 c 141 s 1; RRS s 9351-1. (viii) 1927 c 209 s 2, part; 1925 ex.s. c 183 s 2, part; 1923 c 141 s 2, part; RRS s 9351-2, part.]